Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2517
Allocation of funds for street purposes; factors used.

The following factors and weights shall be used in determining the amount to be allocated to each of the municipalities or municipal counties for street purposes each year:

(1) Total population of each incorporated municipality or the urbanized area of a municipal county, as determined by the most recent federal census figures certified by the Tax Commissioner as provided in section 77-3,119, fifty percent;

(2) Total motor vehicle registrations, other than prorated commercial vehicles, in each incorporated municipality or the urbanized area of a municipal county, as determined from the most recent information available from the Department of Motor Vehicles, thirty percent; and

(3) Total number of miles of traffic lanes of streets in each incorporated municipality or the urbanized area of a municipal county, as determined by the most recent inventory available within the Department of Transportation, twenty percent.

Laws 1969, c. 316, § 7, p. 1141;

Laws 1993, LB 726, § 10;

Laws 1994, LB 1127, § 6;

Laws 2001, LB 142, § 49;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 169.